Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.205

Youth and young adults exiting publicly funded system of care—Rapid response team.

(1) The department, in coordination with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority, shall develop and implement a rapid response team that is prepared to respond appropriately to support youth and young adults exiting a publicly funded system of care. As part of the development and implementation of the rapid response team, the department shall develop and implement a system for:

(a) Identifying youth and young adults that should be served by the rapid response team;

(b) Initiating use of the rapid response team in a timely manner that will allow for the best possible transition planning; and

(c) Locating services and connecting youth and young adults with those services to establish stability.

(2) The rapid response team developed under this section may provide assistance and support to youth and young adults who are at risk of becoming homeless and who are exiting a publicly funded system of care with the goal of securing appropriate housing and other supports for the youth or young adult. If there is no housing identified for a youth or young adult upon exit, the rapid response team shall meet before a youth or young adult transitions out of a publicly funded system of care to allow the youth or young adult to better prepare for the exit. The assistance and support provided under this subsection should occur as soon as possible, particularly if a youth or young adult presents risk factors that place the youth at higher risk of possible homelessness.

(3) Any of the following individuals may refer a youth or young adult to the rapid response team:

(a) A youth or young adult themselves;

(b) A family member of a youth or young adult;

(c) An advocate for a youth or young adult;

(d) An educator;

(e) A law enforcement officer;

(f) An employee of the department or the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs;

(g) A service provider contracting with or licensed by the department;

(h) A behavioral health service provider serving a youth or young adult; or

(i) A service provider contracting with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Publicly funded system of care" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.330.720;

(b) "Rapid response team" means a team of representatives from relevant state agencies that meet to respond to complex cases involving a youth or young adult located anywhere in the state exiting a publicly funded system of care to support those youth or young adults with the goal of securing appropriate housing and other supports for the youth or young adult. Services and supports under this section must incorporate youth or young adult voice and choice. The services under this section must be responsive to the individual needs of each youth or young adult and may include, but are not limited to:

(i) Behavioral health services;

(ii) Civil legal aid;

(iii) Peer support;

(iv) Family reconciliation or engagement services;

(v) Employment support;

(vi) Education support;

(vii) Case management;

(viii) Housing and financial support; or

(ix) Other navigation support to secure safe and stable housing; and

(c) "Youth" and "young adult" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.330.702.

(5) By November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department, in coordination with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide a report to the legislature and the governor including data and recommendations related to the rapid response team created in this section. The report required under this subsection must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036. The report required under this subsection must include the following:

(a) The number of people referred to the rapid response team and the types of people making referrals to the rapid response team;

(b) The demographic data of the people served by the rapid response team;

(c) The types of services identified as needed for the people served by the rapid response team;

(d) The availability of the services identified as needed for the people served by the rapid response team; and

(e) The barriers identified to adequately address the needs of people referred to the rapid response team and recommendations to address those barriers.

[ 2022 c 137 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 137 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2023." [ 2022 c 137 s 6.]

Findings—Intent—2022 c 137: See note following RCW 43.330.723.